Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.055

Custody by law enforcement officer—Release from liability.

(1) A law enforcement officer shall take into custody a child taken in violation of RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070. The law enforcement officer shall make every reasonable effort to avoid placing additional trauma on the child by obtaining such custody at times and in a manner least disruptive to the child. The law enforcement officer shall return the child to the person or agency having the right to physical custody unless the officer has reasonable grounds to believe the child should be taken into custody under RCW 13.34.050 or 26.44.050. If there is no person or agency having the right to physical custody available to take custody of the child, the officer may place the child in shelter care as provided in RCW 13.34.060.

(2) A law enforcement officer or public employee acting reasonably and in good faith shall not be held liable in any civil action for returning the child to a person having the apparent right to physical custody.

[ 1984 c 95 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 95: See note following RCW 9A.40.060.